Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,118.02
Sections; applicability to the operation of any motor vehicle except a commercial motor vehicle.

Sections 60-4,118.02 to 60-4,130.05 shall apply to the operation of any motor vehicle except a commercial motor vehicle.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 62;

Laws 1991, LB 44, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 105, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 211, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 27;

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB158, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 60-4,112;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 57.
July 18, 2026